nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Kunstrijden en ijshockey > Onderdelen voor hockeysticks: Hockeystickbladen; Eindstoppen en verlengstukken voor hockeysticks; Grips voor hockeysticks; Schachten voor ijshockeysticks
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulys > Ritmušų dalys: Ritmušų mentės; Ledo ritulio lazdų antgalių kamščiai ir prailginimai; Ledo ritulio lazdų rankenų apvijos; Ritmušų kotai
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Łyżwiarstwo figurowe i hokej > Części kijów hokejowych: Łopatki kijów hokejowych; Końcówki i przedłużki do kijów hokejowych; Owijki i uchwyty na kije hokejowe; Rękojeści kijów hokejowych
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 花样滑冰与冰球 > 冰球/曲棍球杆部件: 冰球/曲棍球杆杆刃; 冰球杆塞尾与加长杆; 冰球杆握把带; 冰球/曲棍球杆杆柄
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Konståkning och hockey > Delar till hockeyklubbor: Hockeyklubblad; Knoppar och förlängare till ishockeyklubbor; Grepp till ishockeyklubbor; Hockeyklubbskaft
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фигурно пързаляне и хокей > Части за стикове за хокей: Остриета за стикове за хокей; Тапи и удължители за краища на хокейни стикове; Захвати за хокейни стикове; Дръжки за стикове за хокей
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ & χόκεϊ > Εξαρτήματα μπαστουνιών χόκεϊ: Λεπίδες μπαστουνιών χόκεϊ; Τάπες και προεκτάσεις για μπαστούνια χόκεϊ; Λαβές για μπαστούνια χόκεϊ; Κοντάρια μπαστουνιών χόκεϊ
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pattinaggio di figura e hockey > Ricambi per mazze da hockey: Lame per mazze da hockey; Tappi ed estensioni per bastoni da hockey; Grip per bastoni da hockey; Bastoni da hockey
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Krasobruslení a hokej > Díly hokejek: Čepele hokejek; Koncovky a nástavce na hokejky; Gripy na hokejky; Rukojeti hokejek
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用品 > アイスホッケー用スティックパーツ: アイスホッケー用スティックブレード; ホッケースティック用エンドプラグ・エクステンション; ホッケースティック用グリップ; アイスホッケー用スティックシャフト
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Artistik Paten ve Hokey > Hokey Sopası Parçaları: Hokey Sopası Kızakları; Hokey sopası uç tapaları ve uzatmaları; Hokey sopası tutamakları; Hokey Sopası Şaftları
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Krasokorčuľovanie a hokej > Diely na hokejky: Čepele na hokejky; Koncovky a predĺženia hokejok; Rúčky na hokejky; Palice na hokejky
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Hóquei e patinagem artística > Peças para stick de hóquei: Lâminas para stick de hóquei; Tampões e extensões para sticks de hóquei; Fitas de aderência para sticks de hóquei; Hastes para stick de hóquei
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Kunstløp og hockey > Deler til hockeykøller: Blader til hockeykøller; Endeplugger og forlengere for hockeykøller; Grep for hockeykøller; Skaft til hockeykøller
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Taitoluistelu ja jääkiekko > Jääkiekkomailan osat: Jääkiekkomailan lavat; Jääkiekkomailan tupit ja jatkopalat; Jääkiekkomailan gripit; Jääkiekkomailan varret
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Patinaje artístico y hockey > Piezas para palos de hockey: Palas para palos de hockey; Extensiones y tapones para extremos de palos de hockey; Agarres para palos de hockey; Mangos para palos de hockey
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Umetnostno drsanje in hokej > Deli za hokejske palice: Rezila za hokejske palice; Končni čepi in podaljški za hokejske palice; Ročaji za palice za hokej; Gredi za hokejske palice
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu > Bộ phận gậy hockey: Lưỡi gậy hockey; Chốt bịt đầu và ống nối dài gậy khúc côn cầu; Cán gậy khúc côn cầu; Cán gậy hockey
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Umjetničko klizanje i hokej > Dijelovi hokejaške palice: Oštrice hokejaške palice; Čepovi i produžeci za hokejaške palice; Hvatovi za palice za hokej; Drške hokejaške palice
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Kunstskøjteløb og ishockey > Hockeystav – dele: Blade til hockeystave; Endepropper og forlængere til hockeystave; Greb til hockeystave; Hockeystave
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Patinaj artistic și hochei > Piese pentru crosa de hochei: Lame pentru crose de hochei; Dopuri terminale și extensii pentru crose de hochei; Gripuri pentru crose de hochei; Tije pentru crose de hochei
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей и фигурное катание > Детали хоккейных клюшек: Крюки хоккейных клюшек; Надставки и заглушки для хоккейных клюшек; Обмотки на рукоятку хоккейной клюшки; Черенки хоккейных клюшек
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong > Jégkorongütő-tartozékok: Jégkorongütő-pengék; Hokiütő végdugók és hosszabbítók; Hokiütő markolatok; Jégkorongütő-szárak
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Patinação artística e hóquei > Peças para tacos de hóquei: Lâminas para tacos de hóquei; Extensões e tampas de extremidade para taco de hóquei; Grips para taco de hóquei; Cabos para tacos de hóquei
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Figure Skating & Hockey > Hockey Stick Parts: Hockey Stick Blades; Hockey Stick End Plugs & Extensions; Hockey Stick Grips; Hockey Stick Shafts
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > สเกตลีลาและฮอกกี้ > ชิ้นส่วนไม้ฮอกกี้: ส่วนหัวของไม้ฮอกกี้; ปลอกหุ้มปลายและตัวต่อความยาวไม้ฮอกกี้; กริปด้ามจับไม้ฮอกกี้; ด้ามไม้ฮอกกี้
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Patinage artistique et hockey > Pièces de crosses de hockey: Lames de crosses de hockey; Embouts et rallonges pour crosses de hockey; Grips pour crosses de hockey; Manches de crosses de hockey
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球 > 曲棍球桿零件: 曲棍球桿刀面; 曲棍球桿尾塞與延長管; 曲棍球桿握把; 曲棍球桿
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 > 하키 스틱 부품: 하키 스틱 블레이드; 하키 스틱 엔드 플러그 및 익스텐션; 하키 스틱 그립; 하키 스틱 샤프트
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Eiskunstlauf & Hockey > Hockeyschlägerteile: Hockeyschlägerkellen; Endkappen & Verlängerungen für Hockeyschläger; Griffe für Hockeyschläger; Hockey-Schlägerschäfte